District of Columbia statutes.
29-809.08

Filings required for domestication; effective date.

(a)

After a plan of domestication is approved, a domesticating company shall deliver to the Mayor for filing articles of domestication, which shall include:

(1)

A statement, as the case may be, that the company has been domesticated from or into another jurisdiction;

(2)

The name of the domesticating company and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

(3)

The name of the domesticated company and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

(4)

The date the domestication is effective under the governing statute of the domesticated company;

(5)

If the domesticating company was a limited liability company, a statement that the domestication was approved as required by this chapter;

(6)

If the domesticating company was a foreign limited liability company, a statement that the domestication was approved as required by the governing statute of the other jurisdiction; and

(7)

If the domesticated company was a foreign limited liability company not authorized to do business in the District, the street and mailing addresses of an office that the Mayor may use for the purposes of § 29-809.09(b).

(b)

A domestication shall be effective:

(1)

When the certificate of organization takes effect, if the domesticated company is a limited liability company; and

(2)

According to the governing statute of the domesticated company, if the domesticated organization is a foreign limited liability company.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-809.07.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1012 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).